Hawaii statutes.
[§489J-1 Automated teller machine
fees.] An owner or operator of an automated teller machine may assess a
transaction fee on any person for use of that machine who uses a card or other
access device for an account that is located within or without the United
States.

Agreements to operate or share an automated
teller machine may not prohibit, limit, or restrict the right of the owner or
operator of the automated teller machine to charge a person a transaction fee.
[L 2008, c 4, §3]

Cross References

See also §412:14-100.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next